
































Nuveen Asset Management LLC Has $626,000 Position in LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN) - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for LivaNova PLC
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor LivaNova PLC with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Kinder Morgan, Inc. (NYSE:KMI) Shares Sold by Livforsakringsbolaget Skandia Omsesidigt
Nuveen Asset Management LLC Has $626,000 Position in LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN)
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Has $340,000 Position in Albemarle Corporation (NYSE:ALB)
Rice Midstream Partners LP (NYSE:RMP) Shares Bought by Creative Planning
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Buys 4,080 Shares of Cheniere Energy, Inc. (LNG)
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Boosts Position in Plexus Corp. (PLXS)
Creative Planning Boosts Stake in Sandstorm Gold Ltd (NASDAQ:SAND)
Creative Planning Purchases 3,753 Shares of AllianceBernstein Holding L.P. (AB)
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Has $346,000 Position in Mueller Industries, Inc. (NYSE:MLI)
Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V. Invests $1.09 Million in TELUS Corporation (NYSE:TU)
Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V. Purchases Shares of 17,311 Veeva Systems Inc. (VEEV)
Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V. Acquires 66,083 Shares of New York Community Bancorp, Inc. (NYSE:NYCB)
Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V. Purchases 12,074 Shares of Xerox Corporation (XRX)
Creative Planning Cuts Position in Central Garden & Pet Company (CENT)
ABM Industries Incorporated (NYSE:ABM) Stake Reduced by Creative Planning
Aetna Inc. (AET) Position Held by NEXT Financial Group Inc
Fresh Del Monte Produce, Inc. (NYSE:FDP) Stake Held by NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V.
NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V. Sells 6,877 Shares of MSC Industrial Direct Company, Inc. (NYSE:MSM)
NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V. Has $435,000 Stake in Badger Meter, Inc. (BMI)
Kindred Healthcare, Inc. (NYSE:KND) Stake Maintained by Gateway Investment Advisers LLC




 


Nuveen Asset Management LLC Has $626,000 Position in LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN)

					Posted by Mitch Edgeman on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments 




Nuveen Asset Management LLC lowered its stake in shares of  LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN) by 22.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 12,783 shares of the company’s stock after selling 3,652 shares during the period. Nuveen Asset Management LLC’s holdings in LivaNova PLC were worth $626,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
Other institutional investors have also recently made changes to their positions in the company. Icon Advisers Inc. Co. purchased a new position in shares of  LivaNova PLC during the first quarter valued at about $333,000.  Bank of New York Mellon Corp increased its position in shares of  LivaNova PLC by 5.1% in the first quarter. Bank of New York Mellon Corp now owns 374,488 shares of the company’s stock valued at $18,353,000 after buying an additional 18,042 shares during the period.  Norges Bank purchased a new position in shares of  LivaNova PLC during the fourth quarter valued at about $14,987,000.  Dimensional Fund Advisors LP boosted its stake in shares of  LivaNova PLC by 0.8% in the fourth quarter. Dimensional Fund Advisors LP now owns 452,306 shares of the company’s stock worth $20,341,000 after buying an additional 3,730 shares in the last quarter.  Finally, Hosking Partners LLP boosted its stake in shares of  LivaNova PLC by 10.0% in the first quarter. Hosking Partners LLP now owns 185,470 shares of the company’s stock worth $9,090,000 after buying an additional 16,829 shares in the last quarter. 73.01% of the stock is owned by institutional investors. 


 Get LivaNova PLC alerts:



Shares of LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN) opened at 61.56 on Friday. LivaNova PLC has a 52 week low of $40.83 and a 52 week high of $63.21. The company’s 50 day moving average is $61.45 and its 200-day moving average is $54.01. The company’s market capitalization is $3.01 billion. 




LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN) last announced its earnings results on Wednesday, May 3rd. The company reported $0.71 EPS for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.68 by $0.03. The company had revenue of $285.10 million for the quarter. LivaNova PLC had a positive return on equity of 8.77% and a negative net margin of 0.92%.  On average, analysts expect that  LivaNova PLC will post $3.11 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: “Nuveen Asset Management LLC Has $626,000 Position in LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN)” was originally  reported by Markets Daily and is the sole property of of Markets Daily. If you are reading this story on another domain, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of United States & international copyright and trademark laws. The correct version of this story can be accessed at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/28/nuveen-asset-management-llc-has-626000-position-in-livanova-plc-nasdaqlivn.html. 
Separately, BidaskClub cut shares of LivaNova PLC from a “strong-buy” rating to a “buy” rating in a research note on Monday. Three research analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and two have issued  a buy rating to the company. The company presently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $61.33.
In other news, Director Hugh M. Morrison sold 3,215 shares of the stock in a transaction on Friday, May 5th. The stock was sold at an average price of $55.89, for a total transaction of $179,686.35. Following the sale, the director now owns 2,000 shares in the company, valued at $111,780. The sale was disclosed in a document filed with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through the SEC website. Also, Director Alfred J. Novak sold 1,000 shares of the stock in a transaction on Monday, May 22nd. The stock was sold at an average price of $58.49, for a total value of $58,490.00. Following the sale, the director now owns 12,020 shares in the company, valued at approximately $703,049.80. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold 6,215 shares of company stock worth $360,526 in the last 90 days. Company insiders own  0.28% of the company’s stock. 
About LivaNova PLC
LivaNova PLC is a medical device company focused on the development and delivery of therapeutic solutions. The Company’s segments include Cardiac Surgery, Cardiac Rhythm Management, Neuromodulation and Other. The Cardiac Surgery segment is engaged in the development, production and sale of cardiovascular surgery products.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding LIVN? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN).







Receive News & Ratings for LivaNova PLC Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for LivaNova PLC and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website




































































 



Distinctive, First-to-Market ETFs Thematic Technology ETF










































 


OWN YOUR INVESTMENTS




 


ETFs

BIGD
FINQ
GAMR
HACK
IFLY
IMED
IPAY
SILJ




LEARN

INFOGRAPHICS
INVESTOR MATERIALS
EDUCATION
FAQ




NEWS

PRESS
PRINT
VIDEO
AUDIO
EVENTS




ABOUT

ABOUT US
PARTNERS
AWARDS



CONTACT







ETFs

BIGD
FINQ
GAMR
HACK
IFLY
IMED
IPAY
SILJ


LEARN

INFOGRAPHICS
INVESTOR MATERIALS
EDUCATION
FAQ


NEWS

PRESS
PRINT
VIDEO
AUDIO
EVENTS


ABOUT

ABOUT US
PARTNERS
AWARDS


CONTACT







 


About Purefunds







As an innovator of ETF concepts, PureFunds provides the market with access to in-demand industries through thematic ETFs.








Distinctive, First-to-Market ETFs
PureFunds is a New York City based research firm serving as the Sponsor to the PureFunds ETFs. We aim to provide investors with tactical ETFs that may offer investment opportunities in industries that traditionally have been difficult to invest in.
Founded in 2010, PureFunds recognized a void in the Exchange Traded Product universe. Although there were many ETF issuers and products in the marketplace, specific thematic investments that the market desired were simply overlooked. With this realization in mind, we partnered with world-class industry leaders to develop these concepts into tradable products.
With vast experience in global equity investing and ETF trading, we provide refreshing and alternative insight into the growing world of ETFs. PureFunds has constructed a distinct suite of products in an attempt to meet the needs of investors and traders alike.
PureFunds endeavors to increase our presence in the thematic technology ETF marketplace by expanding our suite of innovative, first-to-market ETFs.




 
PureFunds

85 Broad Street | New York, NY 100041-877-756-PURE

Contact Us










Our Partners 











Nasdaq
Nasdaq (Nasdaq: NDAQ) is a leading provider of trading, clearing, exchange technology, listing, information and public company services across six continents. Through its diverse portfolio of solutions, Nasdaq enables customers to plan, optimize and execute their business vision with confidence, using proven technologies that provide transparency and insight for navigating today's global capital markets. As the creator of the world's first electronic stock market, its technology powers more than 70 marketplaces in 50 countries, and 1 in 10 of the world's securities transactions. Nasdaq is home to more than 3,700 listed companies with a market value of $9.3 trillion and 18,000 corporate clients.



To learn more, 
Visit: nasdaq.com/ambition 
or business.nasdaq.com










ISE ETF Ventures
The ISE ETF Ventures team is dedicated to creating and supporting innovative indexes that track growing industries, emerging technologies and markets, and packaged trading strategies. Their index design expertise includes a diverse range of asset classes and instrument types including global equities, fixed income, currencies, futures and options. ISE ETF Ventures partners with issuers to launch unique exchange traded products (ETPs) such as exchange traded funds (ETFs), exchange traded notes (ETNs) and other similar product types. They also provide capital for the start-up and ongoing backstopping of new ETPs. Partners are able to leverage ISE ETF Ventures' global experience and broad network of industry participants in order to grow their ETP presence as well as reduce risk and increase product issuance. Total assets under management for ETPs tied to ISE ETF Ventures indexes exceeds $1.5 billion.



ISE ETF Ventures 
60 Broad Street
New York, NY 10004
212-897-8171
Visit us online at ise.com










NYSE Arca
Listing Venue for the Funds. NYSE Arca is NYSE Euronext's premier listing venue for Exchange Traded Products. Its unique market structure, state of the art electronic trading platform and innovative solutions, drives its business around the world. As a result, sponsors have chosen to list over 1,300 of their Exchange Traded Products on NYSE Arca. NYSE Arca is also the first electronic market to offer issuers a Lead Market Maker program, which is designed to encourage provision of liquidity that contributes to some of the best prices and depth in the Exchange Traded Product marketplace.













ETF Managers Group
Adviser for the Funds, ETF Managers Group, LLC is a leading Exchange Traded Funds (ETF) private label services company. ETF Managers Group offers a full range of ETF product services to the asset management community including commodity pool ETPs as well as both active and passive ETF funds. The services provided include product operations, regulatory, financial and compliance management. ETF Managers Group offers active marketing and dedicated wholesale services for all ETF product types.










Back To Top 








Awards 









2016 Fund Action Awards
Best Specialist ETF, Flows (HACK)
ETF Innovative Product of the Year, Flows (HACK)
ETF Newcomer of the Year, Flows (HACK)
11th Annual Global ETF Awards
Most Innovative ETF, Americas
Most Marketable ETF Ticker, Americas
Capital Link Annual Closed‐End Fund & ETP Awards
Most Innovative ETP of 2014
ETF.com Awards
ETF Ticker of the Year, 2014
Check back for updates to our growing list of awards.
Criteria for Awards





Back To Top 









2016 Fund Action Awards
Voting for the 2016 Fund Action Awards was based on either performance or asset flows over a 12-month period ending in September 2015.
11th Annual Global ETF Award
Determine by voters affiliated with the Global ETF Awards.
Capital Link Annual Closed-End Fund & ETP Awards
The first category is the Closed-End Funds and the ETP/ETF Awards, aimed to identify and recognize those fund sponsors and executives who consistently apply high standards of financial disclosure, investor and shareholder relations and product innovation. The Awards are based on nominations by a committee of analysts and industry specialists who actively follow CEFs and ETP/ETFs. There are separate Nominating Committees for CEFs and ETFs.
2014 ETF.com awards
Awarded to the ETF with the best new ETF ticker. The ETF must have launched in 2014 to qualify.







Connect

PureFunds
85 Broad Street, 18th Floor
New York, NY 10004
1-877-756-PURE (1-877-756-7873)



Contact Us













Sign up for News






















State*ALAKAZARCACTDEDCFLGAHIIDILINIAKSKYLAMEMDMAMIMNMSMOMTNENVNHNJNMNYNCNDOHOKORPARISCSDTNTXUTVTVAWAWVWIWY


 I have read the  privacy policy*Please leave this field empty.
Denotes required field*


 



Search









Privacy Policy
Site map











ETF Managers Group LLC serves as the investment adviser to PureFunds.
International Securities Exchange, LLC ("ISE") Indexes have been licensed for use by PureFunds.
Index data source: International Securities Exchange, LLC ("ISE").
Carefully consider the Funds' investment objectives, risk factors, charges, and expenses before investing. This and additional information can be found in the Funds' prospectuses, which may be obtained by calling 1-877-756-PURE (1.877.756.7873), or by visiting www.PureFunds.com. Read the prospectuses carefully before investing.
Past performance does not guarantee future results.
Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal. Shares of any ETF are bought and sold at market price (not NAV), may trade at a discount or premium to NAV and are not individually redeemed from the Fund. Brokerage commissions will reduce returns. Narrowly focused investments typically exhibit higher volatility.
ETF Managers Group LLC is the investment adviser to the fund. The fund is distributed by ETFMG Financial LLC. ETF Managers Group LLC and ETFMG Financial LLC are wholly owned subsidiaries of Exchange Traded Managers Group LLC (collectively, "ETFMG").


















﻿
































Nuveen Asset Management LLC Has $626,000 Position in LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN) - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for LivaNova PLC
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor LivaNova PLC with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Kinder Morgan, Inc. (NYSE:KMI) Shares Sold by Livforsakringsbolaget Skandia Omsesidigt
Nuveen Asset Management LLC Has $626,000 Position in LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN)
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Has $340,000 Position in Albemarle Corporation (NYSE:ALB)
Rice Midstream Partners LP (NYSE:RMP) Shares Bought by Creative Planning
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Buys 4,080 Shares of Cheniere Energy, Inc. (LNG)
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Boosts Position in Plexus Corp. (PLXS)
Creative Planning Boosts Stake in Sandstorm Gold Ltd (NASDAQ:SAND)
Creative Planning Purchases 3,753 Shares of AllianceBernstein Holding L.P. (AB)
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Has $346,000 Position in Mueller Industries, Inc. (NYSE:MLI)
Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V. Invests $1.09 Million in TELUS Corporation (NYSE:TU)
Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V. Purchases Shares of 17,311 Veeva Systems Inc. (VEEV)
Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V. Acquires 66,083 Shares of New York Community Bancorp, Inc. (NYSE:NYCB)
Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V. Purchases 12,074 Shares of Xerox Corporation (XRX)
Creative Planning Cuts Position in Central Garden & Pet Company (CENT)
ABM Industries Incorporated (NYSE:ABM) Stake Reduced by Creative Planning
Aetna Inc. (AET) Position Held by NEXT Financial Group Inc
Fresh Del Monte Produce, Inc. (NYSE:FDP) Stake Held by NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V.
NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V. Sells 6,877 Shares of MSC Industrial Direct Company, Inc. (NYSE:MSM)
NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V. Has $435,000 Stake in Badger Meter, Inc. (BMI)
Kindred Healthcare, Inc. (NYSE:KND) Stake Maintained by Gateway Investment Advisers LLC




 


Nuveen Asset Management LLC Has $626,000 Position in LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN)

					Posted by Mitch Edgeman on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments 




Nuveen Asset Management LLC lowered its stake in shares of  LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN) by 22.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 12,783 shares of the company’s stock after selling 3,652 shares during the period. Nuveen Asset Management LLC’s holdings in LivaNova PLC were worth $626,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
Other institutional investors have also recently made changes to their positions in the company. Icon Advisers Inc. Co. purchased a new position in shares of  LivaNova PLC during the first quarter valued at about $333,000.  Bank of New York Mellon Corp increased its position in shares of  LivaNova PLC by 5.1% in the first quarter. Bank of New York Mellon Corp now owns 374,488 shares of the company’s stock valued at $18,353,000 after buying an additional 18,042 shares during the period.  Norges Bank purchased a new position in shares of  LivaNova PLC during the fourth quarter valued at about $14,987,000.  Dimensional Fund Advisors LP boosted its stake in shares of  LivaNova PLC by 0.8% in the fourth quarter. Dimensional Fund Advisors LP now owns 452,306 shares of the company’s stock worth $20,341,000 after buying an additional 3,730 shares in the last quarter.  Finally, Hosking Partners LLP boosted its stake in shares of  LivaNova PLC by 10.0% in the first quarter. Hosking Partners LLP now owns 185,470 shares of the company’s stock worth $9,090,000 after buying an additional 16,829 shares in the last quarter. 73.01% of the stock is owned by institutional investors. 


 Get LivaNova PLC alerts:



Shares of LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN) opened at 61.56 on Friday. LivaNova PLC has a 52 week low of $40.83 and a 52 week high of $63.21. The company’s 50 day moving average is $61.45 and its 200-day moving average is $54.01. The company’s market capitalization is $3.01 billion. 




LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN) last announced its earnings results on Wednesday, May 3rd. The company reported $0.71 EPS for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.68 by $0.03. The company had revenue of $285.10 million for the quarter. LivaNova PLC had a positive return on equity of 8.77% and a negative net margin of 0.92%.  On average, analysts expect that  LivaNova PLC will post $3.11 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: “Nuveen Asset Management LLC Has $626,000 Position in LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN)” was originally  reported by Markets Daily and is the sole property of of Markets Daily. If you are reading this story on another domain, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of United States & international copyright and trademark laws. The correct version of this story can be accessed at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/28/nuveen-asset-management-llc-has-626000-position-in-livanova-plc-nasdaqlivn.html. 
Separately, BidaskClub cut shares of LivaNova PLC from a “strong-buy” rating to a “buy” rating in a research note on Monday. Three research analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and two have issued  a buy rating to the company. The company presently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $61.33.
In other news, Director Hugh M. Morrison sold 3,215 shares of the stock in a transaction on Friday, May 5th. The stock was sold at an average price of $55.89, for a total transaction of $179,686.35. Following the sale, the director now owns 2,000 shares in the company, valued at $111,780. The sale was disclosed in a document filed with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through the SEC website. Also, Director Alfred J. Novak sold 1,000 shares of the stock in a transaction on Monday, May 22nd. The stock was sold at an average price of $58.49, for a total value of $58,490.00. Following the sale, the director now owns 12,020 shares in the company, valued at approximately $703,049.80. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold 6,215 shares of company stock worth $360,526 in the last 90 days. Company insiders own  0.28% of the company’s stock. 
About LivaNova PLC
LivaNova PLC is a medical device company focused on the development and delivery of therapeutic solutions. The Company’s segments include Cardiac Surgery, Cardiac Rhythm Management, Neuromodulation and Other. The Cardiac Surgery segment is engaged in the development, production and sale of cardiovascular surgery products.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding LIVN? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for LivaNova PLC (NASDAQ:LIVN).







Receive News & Ratings for LivaNova PLC Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for LivaNova PLC and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website





























































ETF Managers Group Announces Closures Of 2 ETFs - MarketWatch


















































Bulletin






Investor Alert







London Markets Close in:



Currencies
Futures
Metals Stocks




















press release


					July 21, 2017, 4:30 p.m. EDT
				
ETF Managers Group Announces Closures Of 2 ETFs
























SUMMIT, N.J., Jul 21, 2017 (BUSINESS WIRE) --
ETF Managers Group LLC (“ETFMG”) today announced that the Board of 
      Trustees of the ETF Managers Trust has decided to close the PureFunds 
      ISE Big Data ETF (BIGD) and the PureFunds Solactive FinTech ETF (FINQ) 
      based on an ongoing review of market demand. Effective immediately, BIGD 
      and FINQ will increase their cash holdings in contemplation of 
      liquidation and will no longer accept creation orders.


                                        








Trading will be suspended on the NYSE Arca for BIGD and on Nasdaq for 
      FINQ at the closing of the market on July 31, 2017. Proceeds of the 
      liquidation are scheduled to be sent to shareholders on or about August 
      1, 2017. For added information, shareholders can visit         www.purefunds.com
.


                                        

About ETF Managers Group
 (ETFMG)


                                        








ETFMG is a leading Exchange Traded Funds (ETF) private label services 
      company. ETFMG offers a full range of ETF product services to the asset 
      management community including commodity pool ETPs as well as both 
      active and passive ETF funds. The services provided include product 
      operations, regulatory, financial and compliance management. ETF 
      Managers Group offers active marketing and dedicated wholesale services 
      for all ETF product types.


                                        


Before investing, carefully consider the Funds' investment 
      objectives, risk factors, charges, and expenses before investing. This 
      and additional information can be found in the Funds’ prospectuses, 
      which may be obtained by calling 1-844-ETF-MGRS (1-844-383-6477), or by 
      visiting         


.        









Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal. 
      Shares of any ETF are bought and sold at market price (not NAV), may 
      trade at a discount or premium to NAV and are not individually redeemed 
      from the Fund. Brokerage commissions will reduce returns. Narrowly 
      focused investments typically exhibit higher volatility.


                                        








ETF Managers Group LLC is the investment adviser to the funds.


                                        








The funds are distributed by ETFMG Financial LLC. ETF Managers Group LLC 
      and ETFMG Financial LLC are wholly owned subsidiaries of Exchange Traded 
      Managers Group LLC (collectively, “ETFMG”). ETFMG Financial LLC is not 
      affiliated with PureFunds or Solactive.


                                        














View source version on businesswire.com:         http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20170721005604/en/









SOURCE: ETF Managers Group LLC


                                        








MacMillan Communications        
Chris Sullivan/Mike MacMillan, 
212-473-4442        
mike@macmillancom.com









Copyright Business Wire 2017
                    








































Most Popular





1.






The dark side of cruises






2.






Coca-Cola to replace Coke Zero in U.S.






3.





Market Snapshot

Dow ends at record, but tech slump weighs on S&P 500, Nasdaq






4.






If you can buy only one stock or ETF, make it this one






5.





Barron's Buzz

How to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay








Find a Broker

Partner Center »























Featured Stories





Seeing America again through new eyes







How to dig yourself out of debt







Move over, Tesla? Karma unveils its hybrid sports car







The salary you need to afford a home in these 25 cities







Why OPEC will never cut production again













Log In




11:19 AM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
11:18aStock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses 
11:18aOil sets sights on biggest weekly gain of the year
11:16aUPDATE: Invisalign maker Align stocks surge 8% after earnings blow past estimates
11:12aAirbus to sell plant holdings to Motorola
11:11aAmerican Airlines profit falls, unit revenue gains
11:11aChevron swings to profit as charges shrink
11:11aSears Canada's biggest shareholders call off bid
11:10aRedfin's stock debuts 30% above its IPO price
11:10aTime for GOP to face reality: Everybody is going to have health insurance
11:09aBP earnings: What to expect
11:09aExxon, Chevron post strong profits 
11:08aChina penalizes nine banks for forex violations
11:06aRedfin's stock opens at $19.56, or 30% above $15 IPO price
11:03aEurope’s refugee crisis won’t be solved in a distant court
11:01aWhat Trump could do to make Obamacare ‘implode’
10:58aFoxconn’s history of broken promises casts a shadow on Wisconsin news
10:56aHere’s something that can improve your memory — and help you sleep
10:56a$1 million or $5,000 a month: which would you choose?
10:55aThis city’s subway system will soon run mostly on renewable energy
10:55aHow do I get a reverse mortgage?
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,792.95

-3.60
-0.02%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,363.31

-18.88
-0.30%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,468.80

-6.62
-0.27%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15




























































ETF Managers Group LLC: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback



























etf managers group llc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Management
ETF Managers Group LLC operates as an investment management company. The Company offers portfolio management, ETFs, equities, investment strategies, financial planning, and advisory services. ETF Managers Group serves customers in the State of New Jersey.




Corporate Information
Address:

30 Maple Street
Summit, NJ 07901
United States


Phone:
1-844-383-6477


Fax:
1-908-286-8286


Web url:
www.etfmg.com























From The Web











Key Executives


Samuel Ralph Masucci III


Chief Executive Officer




Bernard John Karol


President




John Augustin Flanagan


Chief Financial Officer




Reshma Jashvant Amin


Chief Compliance Officer







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data





































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














Regent Investment Management LLC Has $1.85 Million Position in Danaher Corporation (DHR)













Сontactos











 Home
/ Espectáculos
/ Regent Investment Management LLC Has $1.85 Million Position in Danaher Corporation (DHR) 



Regent Investment Management LLC Has $1.85 Million Position in Danaher Corporation (DHR)

Eneas Benito |
Viernes, Julio 28, 2017







The latest reports which are outstanding on Friday 28th of July state 8 analysts have a rating of "strong buy", 4 analysts "buy", 4 analysts "neutral", 0 analysts "sell" and 0 analysts "strong sell". Brant Point Investment Management Llc sold 73,450 shares as Vantiv Inc (VNTV)'s stock declined 5.33%. Israel Discount Bank of New York GFN purchased a new stake in shares of Danaher Corporation during the fourth quarter worth about $225,000. 34,168 shares were sold by Raskas Daniel, worth $2.87 million on Wednesday, February 1. Danaher Corporation has a 52-week low of $75.71 and a 52-week high of $88.01. 4,816,329 shares of the company were exchanged.Danaher Corporation (NYSE:DHR)'s Return on Assets (ROA) is at 5.00%. Lau Associates LLC now owns 12,571 shares of the conglomerate's stock valued at $1,075,000 after buying an additional 525 shares during the period. The stock of Danaher Corporation (NYSE:DHR) earned "Sector Perform" rating by RBC Capital Markets on Friday, October 23. The stock has been active on the tape, now trading at $81.99, down from yesterday's close by -1.25%. Fjarde AP Fonden Fourth Swedish National Pension Fund's holdings in Danaher Corporation were worth $10,882,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. Proficio Capital Partners LLC increased its position in Danaher Corporation by 92.3% in the first quarter. 508.19 million shares or 0.53% more from 505.49 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported. The firm had revenue of $4.51 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $4.50 billion.
Danaher Corp. (DHR)'s average Piotroski F-Score: 6 during the last 7 years. ClariVest Asset Management LLC bought a new position in Danaher Corporation during the first quarter valued at $157,000. Park National Corp OH boosted its stake in Danaher Corporation by 9.5% in the first quarter. As of the end of the quarter Strs Ohio had disposed of 15,792 shares trimming its position 1.6%. Are Danaher Corporation (NYSE:DHR) Earnings Growing Rapidly? Wafra Investment Advisory Group Inc acquired 12,100 shares as Danaher Corp (DHR)'s stock declined 2.27%. The Glenhill Advisors Llc holds 586,581 shares with $115.79M value, up from 525,961 last quarter. Peddock Capital Advisors LLC boosted its position in Danaher Corporation by 17.4% in the first quarter. Security Asset Management now owns 41,026 shares of the conglomerate's stock worth $3,193,000 after buying an additional 1,794 shares during the period. Motco now owns 1,848 shares of the conglomerate's stock valued at $158,000 after buying an additional 390 shares during the period. The stock price recently experienced a 5-day gain of 0.78% with 0.5 average true range (ATR). The company has a market cap of $56.38 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 25.90 and a beta of 1.05.Several other research firms also recently weighed in on DHR. The rating was downgraded by Janney Capital on Wednesday, June 7 to "Neutral". July 27 investment analysts at Citigroup held the stock rating at "Neutral" but raised the price target from $74.00 to $84.00. One analyst has rated the stock with a sell rating, four have given a hold rating, thirteen have assigned a buy rating and one has issued a strong buy rating to the company. Currently, AutoNation, Inc.net profit margin for the 12 months is at 2.01%. They set a "market perform" rating and a $90.00 price target for the company. Additionally the company declared a dividend that will be paid on Friday the 28th of July 2017. This represents a $0.56 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 0.68%. Danaher Corporation has a average recommendation of "Buy" and a consensus price objective of $91.98. Credit Suisse initiated it with "Outperform" rating and $93 target in Wednesday, February 1 report. If you are accessing this report on another site, it was stolen and reposted in violation of worldwide copyright & trademark law. For now, DHR is the toast of Wall Street as its ABR stands at 1.80 with 8 out of 16 analysts rating the stock a buy. If you are accessing this story on another site, it was stolen and reposted in violation of U.S. & global trademark and copyright law.Also, Director Linda P. Hefner unloaded 10,578 stocks of the company's shares in a trade on early Fri, Jul 21st.Since June 7, 2017, it had 0 buys, and 1 sale for $440,494 activity. The transaction was disclosed in a filing with the SEC, which is accessible through this link. The correct version of this story can be accessed at https://weekherald.com/2017/07/28/hikari-tsushin-inc-has-5118000-stake-in-danaher-corporation-dhr.html. Inverness Counsel LLC /ny/ grew its investment by buying 229,182 shares an increase of 4,706.0% as of 06/30/2017. The last stock close price is down -2.69% from the 200-day moving average, compared to the S&P 500 which has increased 0.06% over the same time. Danaher Corporation's dividend payout ratio (DPR) is presently 17.83%. Company insiders own 12.20% of the company's stock. Lalor Angela S had sold 10,815 shares worth $910,212 on Tuesday, May 23. Following the completion of the sale, the senior vice president now directly owns 39,020 shares in the company, valued at $3,283,923.20. The shares were sold at an average price of $82.97, for a total transaction of $618,790.26.Danaher Corporation Company Profile Danaher Corporation (Danaher) designs, manufactures and markets professional, medical, industrial and commercial products and services.




Latest News
 

Keke Palmer Slams Kylie Jenner For Not Being Herself On Social Media



The Emoji Movie Review



Jennifer Lopez pens sweet message for birthday boy Alex Rodriguez



La ciencia responde por qué los videos de gatos son tan populares



El final de "Game of Thrones" ya está escrito



Lucky Blue Smith and Stormi Bree Welcome Baby Girl



Canadian military tweets after Trump says 'No' to trans troops



Bryce Harper: Only All-Stars Should Participate in Home Run Derby



Demi Moore, con poca ropa en su última película



Simone Biles shares hilarious post-wisdom teeth surgery video



Marty Sklar Dead: Disney Imagineer Was Walt's 'Right Hand Man'



The Jump is sloping off screens for a year



"El próximo sos vos, Kicillof" — Carrió



Kendrick Lamar Brings Out Chance The Rapper In Chicago











Viernes, Julio 28, 2017  





Popular news



Banco Santander Brasil SA (BSBR) Shares Bought by Credit Suisse AG 
				After posting $0.46 EPS for the previous quarter, Banco Santander-Chile (ADR)'s analysts now forecast -8.70 % negative EPS growth. Finally, BNP Paribas Arbitrage SA acquired a new position in Banco Santander-Chile during the first quarter valued at $235,000.


Reps, Senate Differ on FCT Ministerial Nominee 
				This is because as a bicameral legislature, it'll require the assent of both Houses to pass a piece of legislation. Thirty-five per cent affirmative action for women as ministers.


The Rangers are set to trade Yu Darvish 
				Dee Gordon and Christian Yelich started the Marlins' offensive assault in the first inning with each hitting solo homers. In his lone start against the Marlins, Darvish tossed his only career shutout and first complete game in 2014.


Que diga la PGJ si Salgado tiene nexos con "El Ojos": Batres 
				Precisó que los legisladores de su bancada no temen que el caso se abra, porque si se acredita plenamente que hay responsabilidad que se proceda.


Barcelona train crash sees 48 people injured after train ploughs into station 
				The crash happened just after 8am local time when the train was unable to stop and slammed into the platform in the Spanish city.  At least 48 people have been injured, five of them gravely, when a train crashed at a station in Barcelona, Spain tonight.


Manchester City golea al Real Madrid 
				Por sus actuaciones, Zidane lo convocó para la pretemporada del primer equipo en Estados Unidos .  "Franchu" ingresó por Gareth Bale en el inicio del complemento y dejó una buena imagen.


Clashes as Palestinians end boycott of Jerusalem holy site 
				Israeli police said officers had responded after stones were thrown at officers at the gates to the site. Palestinians claimed Israel was trying to expand its control over the site, which Israel denied.


Google removes instant search 
				Google Instant was launched in 2010 under the leadership of Marissa Mayer and instantly became a hit among the masses. Moreover, there were screen, interaction, and input constraints that had invalidated the use of Google Instant.


Tom Brady is the owner of the Jets - according to Google 
				In 30 games against them, he has a 23-7 record with a 62.1 completion percentage, 44 touchdowns and 13 interceptions.  I mean, he's already the owner of the team apparently, at least according to Google.


Man robbed bank, stripped and ran down a Florida street, Federal Bureau of Investigation  says 
				It was an odd occurrence in Fort Lauderdale, Florida when witnesses saw a naked man, running down the street. The Sun Sentinel reports Sperber was taken to the hospital and found to be coherent and uninjured.


Amazon's Jeff Bezos was world's richest person for few hours 
				It also makes TV shows and the Echo smart speaker, which allows users to speak to Alexa, an electronic personal assistant. Gates was worth $90.8 billion while Bezos was at $89.9 million, according to the Bloomberg Billionaire Index .


PREVIA: Real Madrid enfrenta al Manchester City por la Champions Cup 
				Nada más regresar en 2009 a la presidencia del Real Madrid , Florentino Pérez tiró la casa por la ventana. El City , con sus 246 millones de este verano, está cada vez más cerca.


Goldcorp Inc. (NYSE:GG) Given a $18.00 Price Target by Scotiabank Analysts 
				COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: This article was originally published by StockNewsTimes and is the sole property of of StockNewsTimes. GSA Capital Partners LLP bought a new position in shares of Goldcorp during the fourth quarter valued at approximately $137,000.


Julia Banks denies being dual citizen amid questions over Greek heritage 
				But Ms Banks may have inherited Greek citizenship from her father without making any effort to register for it.  Liberal MP Julia Banks says she has never taken up Greek citizenship as speculation swirls around her status.


EnLink Midstream, LLC Common Un (NYSE:ENLC) Experiences Light Trading Volume 
				As of the end of the quarter Chickasaw Capital Management LLC had acquired a total of 100,025 shares growing its holdings by 0.6%. Shares of EnLink Midstream Partners, LP ( ENLK ) opened at 17.10 on Thursday. 274,265 shares of the company were exchanged.







Follow Us









Categories


Mundo


Medicina


Deportes


Tecnología


Espectáculos


Negocios






Recommended stories



Greta Van Susteren fired for refusing MSNBC's 'Trump hate'




Stephanie Davis "devastated" after "sex tape" leaks online




Ginnifer Goodwin and Josh Dallas leaving Once Upon A Time




Bill O'Reilly promises 'truth will come out' regarding sexual harassment claims




Kate Middleton is never seen riding a horse unlike many royals




Miley Cyrus, Rosario Dawson, Suki Waterhouse nude photos published online




Gilbert Baker, creator of LGBT rainbow flag, dies in NY




GEICO Bassmaster Classic underway on Lake Conroe




Girl, 15, missing from Lawndale found safe




Joy-Anna Duggar's Sisters React to Her Engagement News




Jamie Dornan: Amelia Warner confides in their wedding from Fifty Shades Darker




Why Democratic Women Are Wearing White to Donald Trump's Congressional Speech Tonight




Christina El Moussa, Gary Anderson, And Flip Or Flop Divorce




Who Got Eliminated On The Bachelor 2017 Tonight? Week 7




Tamron Hall departs NBC and MSNBC




















ETF Managers Group Announces Closures Of 2 ETFs - TheStreet




































































 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 








































ETF Managers Group Announces Closures Of 2 ETFs






Business Wire




Jul 21, 2017 4:30 PM EDT













 




























































  ETF Managers Group LLC ("ETFMG") today announced that the Board of Trustees of the ETF Managers Trust has decided to close the PureFunds ISE Big Data ETF (BIGD) and the PureFunds Solactive FinTech ETF (FINQ) based on an ongoing review of market demand. Effective immediately, BIGD and FINQ will increase their cash holdings in contemplation of liquidation and will no longer accept creation orders.  Trading will be suspended on the NYSE Arca for BIGD and on Nasdaq for FINQ at the closing of the market on July 31, 2017. Proceeds of the liquidation are scheduled to be sent to shareholders on or about August 1, 2017. For added information, shareholders can visit www.purefunds.com.  About ETF Managers Group (ETFMG)  ETFMG is a leading Exchange Traded Funds (ETF) private label services company. ETFMG offers a full range of ETF product services to the asset management community including commodity pool ETPs as well as both active and passive ETF funds. The services provided include product operations, regulatory, financial and compliance management. ETF Managers Group offers active marketing and dedicated wholesale services for all ETF product types.   Before investing, carefully consider the Funds' investment objectives, risk factors, charges, and expenses before investing. This and additional information can be found in the Funds' prospectuses, which may be obtained by calling 1-844-ETF-MGRS (1-844-383-6477), or by visiting   www.purefunds.com  .   Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal. Shares of any ETF are bought and sold at market price (not NAV), may trade at a discount or premium to NAV and are not individually redeemed from the Fund. Brokerage commissions will reduce returns. Narrowly focused investments typically exhibit higher volatility.  ETF Managers Group LLC is the investment adviser to the funds.  The funds are distributed by ETFMG Financial LLC. ETF Managers Group LLC and ETFMG Financial LLC are wholly owned subsidiaries of Exchange Traded Managers Group LLC (collectively, "ETFMG"). ETFMG Financial LLC is not affiliated with PureFunds or Solactive.  



 








 










































If you liked this article you might like













3 ETFs to Buy If You Think IBM Will Beat Earnings
IBM is transitioning its business from areas like the mainframe and on premise software to artificial intelligence and cloud computing. These three ETFs may benefit if investors react positively.



Chris Ciaccia

Oct 17, 2016 3:08 PM EDT








































 











Trending


Amazon and Starbucks Team Up to Take Down Nasdaq


Starbucks Shares Are Crashing; Go Out and Buy!


Here's How You Can Get a Decent Job at Amazon on August 2


Tesla's Model 3 Arrives on Friday -- Here's Everything You Need to Know About This Over-Hyped Ride


I Believe 'Ugly' Would Be the Proper Term for the Selloff: Market Recon











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft

















ETF Managers Group | ETF Investments | ETF Stocks | Exchange Traded Funds





































































 

















Follow Us 




 






 
  Previous    Next  







WE MAKE IT EASY TO LAUNCH
Click to play 





×






























ETF Managers Group manages/ exclusively wholesales 16 funds and $1.3 Billion in assets… BDAT,  EMQQ, ETHO, HACK, IPAY, ITEQ, CNCR, SILJ, RISE, LARE, YYY, IFLY, GAMR, WSKYETF Managers Group manages/ exclusively wholesales 16 funds and $1.3 Billion in assets… BDAT,  EMQQ, ETHO, HACK, IPAY, ITEQ, CNCR, SILJ, RISE, LARE, YYY, IFLY, GAMR, WSKY 









ETF Managers Group is the only private label issuer to offer sponsors a fully managed solution for all ETF types.






Services
 




Resources
 



 
Partners
 



  
About us
 








ETFMG by the numbers





 $1,271,868,813ETFMG Client assets:Managed/Exclusively Wholesaled
 


16Total funds  


455 %2015 AUM Growth Rate 








Access the market with an experienced ETF issuer





1 Accelerated
Entry

75 Days


ETFMG can bring ETF’s to market in as little as 75 days.

Click To Learn More








2 Custom
Fit

Product Solutions


Our partners enjoy a customized issuer experience designed to fit their unique product needs.

Click To Learn More








3Operational
Management

High Efficiency


ETFMG oversees the custody, fund administration, capital market, legal, reporting, and account functions.

Click To Learn More







4 ETF
Wholesaling

Targeted Wholesaling


Dedicated sales people for market education including RIA’s, FA’s, and institutional asset managers.

Click To Learn More










PARTNERSHIPS


Client partners will leverage our relationships with the best ETF service provider team we’ve assembled over the past 10 years based on experience, quality, and fair market client pricing.
ETF LIQUIDITY

Benefit from our vast relationships with the leading market maker and authorized participant desks.





INFRASTRUCTURE


Provide broad based issuer support through integrated infrastructure design and partnership agreements. 
OUR FOCUS IS ON YOU

ETFMG does not manage any of it’s own proprietary funds, we are 100% client focused.





SCALE


Our partners benefit from economies of scale by leveraging our expert service providers across our portfolio of products. They also enjoy favorable pricing power due to multiple product offerings.





ETF WHOLESALING


Dedicated sales people for market education including RIA’s, FA’s, and institutional asset managers. Our services also extend to product presentations, industry conference representation and institutional trade desks.(Service also offered as third party option.)














Fund Management & Wholesale Partners

Ticker Symbol: BIGDTicker Symbol: EMQQTicker Symbol: ETHOTicker Symbol: HACKTicker Symbol: IPAYTicker Symbol: ITEQTicker Symbol: CNCRTicker Symbol: SILJTicker Symbol: RISETicker Symbol: LARETicker Symbol: YYY








 





ETF Managers Group, LLC and ETFMG Financial, LLC are subsidiaries of Exchange Traded Managers Group, LLC. ETFMG Financial, LLC is a broker-dealer registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission and is regulated by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority as a FINRA member firm. 




















Apply For A Position


Your Name (Required)



Your E-Mail (Required)



Subject



Your Message





Upload Resume












				













































ETF Managers Group Revolutionize the exchange traded products marketplace empowering issuers 



































































 

















Follow Us 




 







ETF Managers Group manages/ exclusively wholesales 16 funds and $1.3 Billion in assets… BDAT,  EMQQ, ETHO, HACK, IPAY, ITEQ, CNCR, SILJ, RISE, LARE, YYY, IFLY, GAMR, WSKYETF Managers Group manages/ exclusively wholesales 16 funds and $1.3 Billion in assets… BDAT,  EMQQ, ETHO, HACK, IPAY, ITEQ, CNCR, SILJ, RISE, LARE, YYY, IFLY, GAMR, WSKY 











Join us while we revolutionize the exchange traded products marketplace.














 Who
We Are

Click Here







 Our
Mission

Click Here







 How We
Do It

Click Here













 

Sam Masucci
Chief Executive Officer & Founder




 

Barney Karol 
President & Founder




 

John Flanagan 
Chief Financial Officer 





 

Reshma Amin 
Chief Compliance Officer 





 

Timothy Collins 
Senior Portfolio Manager 














Our Mission



Revolutionize the exchange traded products marketplace empowering issuers to launch their unique ETF products with the support of a high end, controlled environment tailored to fit their needs.











How We Do It



We provide sponsor clients with a seamless, fully managed, private label service engineered to provide accelerated entry into the ETF market in the most time and cost efficient way available today. Additionally, we provide hands-on targeted wholesaling and marketing expertise throughout the life of the fund.











Select ETF Industry Achievements:



Co-founded and led MacroMarkets LLC an innovative ETF and financial products firm.
Managed over $1.7B in assets through the first “paired” ETF products.
Developed the S&P-Case/Shiller home price index for the creation of housing risk
management products.
Awarded 11 financial product patents.
Received William F. Sharpe Achievement award for most innovative benchmark index.
Awarded 2008 Time Magazine best invention for U.S. housing ETF.
Multiple guest speaker appearances on CNBC and Fox Business.
Significant print media coverage for ETF and Index achievements including: Fortune
Magazine, Index Universe, NY Time Magazine, ETF trends and Bloomberg Magazine.










Get in Touch With Us















I want more information on your ETF productsI want to launch the next great ETFMedia Inquiry




First Name* 


Last Name* 

Email*  
Phone Number* 
Service/Product*  
Comments*  
*Required fields





 






ETF Managers Group, LLC and ETFMG Financial, LLC are subsidiaries of Exchange Traded Managers Group, LLC. ETFMG Financial, LLC is a broker-dealer registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission and is regulated by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority as a FINRA member firm. 











×







 

Sam Masucci
Chief Executive Officer & Founder






Samuel Masucci
Mr. Masucci has more than 25 years experience in investment banking, structured product development, sales and trading. He has held senior positions at Bear Stearns, UBS, SBC Warburg, and Merrill Lynch and has a proven track record of creating, building and managing businesses for the issuance, sales and trading of: ETFs, index products, commodity products, hedge funds, ABS, and OTC structured products in the U.S. and Europe. He has significant experience in asset management product sales to institutional investors including pension funds, consultants, insurance companies and hedge funds as well as to broker dealer networks and RIAs.

Co-founded and led MacroMarkets LLC an innovative ETF and financial products firm.
Managed over $1.7B in assets through the first "paired" ETF products.
Awarded 11 financial product patents.
Received William F. Sharpe Achievement award for most innovative benchmark index.
Awarded 2008 Time Magazine best invention for U.S. housing ETF.
Multiple guest speaker appearances on CNBC and Fox Business.
Significant print media coverage for ETF and Index achievements including: Fortune
			Magazine, Index Universe, NY Time Magazine, ETF trends and Bloomberg Magazine.









 

Barney Karol 
President & Founder






Barney Karol 
Bernard Karol is a co-founder of ETF Managers Group and is president of the firm. He is a member of the New York bar and an inactive member of the California bar. He was previously the principal of The Fiduciary Group, a consulting firm, where he originated transactions that added significant new AUM for investment management firm clients. He also served as a Managing Director at MacroMarkets LLC with Mr. Masucci. Before that he was a partner at the Wall St. law firm of Carter, Ledyard & Milburn where he focused on financial services, derivatives and exchange traded funds. He was a senior member of the legal team that developed and registered the initial I-Shares. He is the author of numerous articles on investment management topics and is a graduate of the Notre Dame Law School.








 

John Flanagan 
Chief Financial Officer 






John Flanagan 
Mr. Flanagan serves as the Principal Financial Officer of ETF Managers Capital and ETF Commodity Trust I. Since June 2014, Mr. Flanagan serves as an Independent Trustee of Absolute Shares Trust, a multi-series exchange traded fund. Mr. Flanagan has been the President and sole owner of John A Flanagan CPA, LLC since December 2010. Mr. Flanagan was Chief Financial Officer of MacroMarkets LLC, an exchange traded fund issuer from January 2007 to December 2010.








 

Dave Weissman 
Chief Compliance Officer 






David Weissman 
Mr. Weissman oversees and manages the implementation of all elements of operations and the regulatory compliance requirements and reports pursuant to SEC, FINRA, NFA, CFTC and NYSE rules and regulations. Prior to joining ETFMG, Mr. Weissman served as Chief Administrative and Chief Compliance Officer of ARK Investment Management LLC , a Registered Investment Advisor and ETF issuer. Mr. Weissman served as Chief Compliance Officer of Factor Advisors, Factor Capital Management, LLC and FactorShares and was an independent consultant to issuers in the ETF market. Prior to that, Mr. Weissman served as Chief Operating Officer and Chief Compliance Officer to FocusShares LLC, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Scottrade LLC, an ETF issuer and Investment Adviser.








 

Timothy Collins 
Senior Portfolio Manager 






Timothy Collins 
Mr. Collins has over 25 years of experience in financial services, having spent the last 15+ years establishing trading operations and investment firms in both the US and Europe.
Prior to joining ETF Managers Group, he was a founding partner of Fairfield Advisors, where he developed sophisticated trading strategies with an emphasis on ETFs and commodities.
Mr. Collins established market making operations for European based ETF products for both Goldman Sachs & Spear Leeds Kellogg in London.  He was responsible for primary market making activity in a large number of indexed products, including exchange traded funds, equity baskets, futures, swaps and other derivative instruments.
Before that, Tim was head trader for Intermarket Management, Inc., where he was responsible for index arbitrage in the Commodity Research Bureau (CRB) Commodity Index and the US Dollar Index.  In this role, he worked on behalf of several US pension funds and corporations.
Mr. Collins received a Masters of Business Administration from the Stern School of Business at New York University with a dual major in Finance and International Business.  He also has a Bachelor of Science degree in Finance from Fairfield University. 








 

Reshma Amin 
Chief Compliance Officer 






Reshma Amin 
Ms. Amin was previously a Partner at Crow & Cushing, a Princeton-based securities law firm, counseling clients in the financial services and money management industry.  Ms. Amin has broad experience in U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, Commodity Futures Trading Commission, National Futures Association and FINRA compliance, including all types of registration and regulatory matters.
Ms. Amin has also worked at the NYSE and FINRA and was a law clerk to the Honorable Philip L. Paley, Superior Court of New Jersey, Law Division and, prior to that, was an extern for the US Attorney's Office in Cleveland, Ohio.  Ms. Amin is an active member of 100 Women in Hedge Funds and is also involved with the Oliver Scholars Program.
Ms. Amin received a B.S. from The George Washington University and a J.D. from Case Western Reserve University School of Law and is admitted to the New Jersey and New York state bars.
























Apply For A Position


Your Name (Required)



Your E-Mail (Required)



Subject



Your Message





Upload Resume












				



































ETF Managers Group Launches New FINRA-Registered Broker DealerHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets close in 4 hrs 41 minsS&P 5002,468.91-6.51 (-0.26%)Dow 3021,794.22-2.33 (-0.01%)Nasdaq6,363.47-18.72 (-0.29%)Stocks to WatchIntel impresses with strong quarter, Starbucks and Mattel shares are tankingETF Managers Group Launches New FINRA-Registered Broker DealerMarketwiredMay 3, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareSUMMIT, NJ--(Marketwired - May 03, 2017) - ETF Managers Group LLC (ETFMG), the leading private label issuer of exchange traded funds (ETFs), today announced that it has launched its own FINRA-registered broker dealer, ETFMG Financial LLC, to provide distribution services to its growing family of ETFs.The ETF Managers Group funds utilizing the new broker dealer are: the PureFunds family of ETFs (HACK) (BIGD) (FINQ) (GAMR) (IFLY) (IMED) (IPAY) (SILJ); Etho Climate Leadership U.S. ETF (ETHO); Sit Rising Rate ETF (RISE); Spirited Funds/ETFMG Whiskey & Spirits ETF (WSKY); BlueStar TA-BIGITech® Israeli Technology ETF (ITEQ); and Tierra XP Latin America Real Estate ETF (LARE).ETFMG Financial LLC replaced ALPS Distributors, Inc. on April 1, 2017."This is another significant step in building out a full platform of ETF services," said Samuel Masucci, CEO and Co-founder of ETF Managers Group. "We are excited about bringing distribution in house which enhances our already expansive services that benefit our partners and the investors in our funds.""I've worked with Sam's group since 2012 and this development is consistent with ETFMG's continued success delivering high-quality services to fund shareholders and their partners," said Bryce Doty. Doty, a Senior Portfolio Manager at Sit Investment Associates, Inc. managing $7 billion in various bond strategies, worked with ETF Managers Group to launch one of their unique interest rate hedging strategies as the Sit Rising Rate ETF."We work very closely with the team at ETFMG for the distribution and wholesale marketing of the BlueStar TA-BIGITech Israel Technology ETF (ITEQ) -- which is the first ETF focused on Israeli's dynamic tech sector," said Steven Schoenfeld, industry veteran and CIO of BlueStar Indexes. "Israeli Technology is a compelling investment thesis, and we believe that ETFMG's management of distribution will be an asset for us in communicating with advisors and investors.""Prior to investing, advisors and asset managers evaluate the merits of an ETF as well as the strength and capabilities of the issuer's management team," said Conor Platt, founder of Etho.Capital, which develops ESG strategies with the goal of delivering investments that perform both financially and sustainably. "The experienced management team at ETFMG and the greater amount of fund services they have brought in-house leads to day-to-day efficiencies for us, better communication, and we think ultimately better management of the fund."About ETF Managers Group (ETFMG)ETFMG is the leading Exchange Traded Funds (ETF) private label services company. ETFMG offers a full range of ETF product services to the asset management community including commodity pool ETPs as well as both active and passive ETF funds. The services provided include product operations, regulatory, financial and compliance management. ETF Managers Group offers active marketing and dedicated wholesale services for all ETF product types.Carefully consider the Funds' investment objectives, risk factors, charges, and expenses before investing. This and additional information can be found in the Funds' prospectuses, which may be obtained by calling 1-844-ETF-MGRS (1-844-383-6477), or by visiting the Funds' websites. Read the prospectuses carefully before investing.The prospectus for the Sit Rising Rate ETF can be viewed here.Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal. Shares of any ETF are bought and sold at market price (not NAV), may trade at a discount or premium to NAV and are not individually redeemed from the Fund. Brokerage commissions will reduce returns. Narrowly focused investments typically exhibit higher volatility.ETF Managers Group LLC is the investment adviser to the funds.The funds are distributed by ETFMG Financial LLC. ETF Managers Group LLC and ETFMG Financial LLC are wholly owned subsidiaries of Exchange Traded Managers Group LLC (collectively, "ETFMG"). Samuel Masucci is a registered rep of ETFMG Financial LLC.ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextEnergy to Drive Q2 Earnings: Will ETFs Rebound?ZacksEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredTrump’s unwitting legacy could be universal health coverageYahoo FinanceSean Hannity responds to claim he ran up a $42,000 tab at Trump's hotel after flying in a 70-year-old lobster from MaineBusiness InsiderIntel impresses with strong quarter, Starbucks and Mattel shares are tankingYahoo FinanceZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredAmazon shares fall after profit falls way short of expectationsYahoo Finance Video9 ways to break free from your credit card debtYahoo FinanceTobacco stocks tank after FDA says it plans to cut nicotine in cigarettes to non-addictive levelsBusiness InsiderDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredU.S. economic growth picks up in second quarter, wages continue to lagReutersWall Street opens lower as Amazon weighs on tech stocksReutersExxon stock falls after earnings miss estimates; Chevron gainsYahoo Finance Video"Women Need To Carry This Device With Them"Siren SongSponsoredInvestors yawn as US economic growth rebounds in the second quarter; Amazon fallsYahoo FinanceAmazon billionaire Jeff Bezos' look has changed drastically since he started the companyBusiness InsiderKellyanne Conway: Ethical disclosures discourage people from government serviceJoe F: Conway has some legitimate competition now with Scaramucci on board about who can say the dumbest thing while representing the administration.  Looks like she just took the lead though.Join the Conversation1 / 52.5k








ETF Managers Group, LLC Announces Closure of its Restaurant ETFHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets close in 4 hrs 41 minsS&P 5002,468.91-6.51 (-0.26%)Dow 3021,794.22-2.33 (-0.01%)Nasdaq6,363.47-18.72 (-0.29%)Stocks to WatchIntel impresses with strong quarter, Starbucks and Mattel shares are tankingETF Managers Group, LLC Announces Closure of its Restaurant ETFMarketwiredDecember 9, 2016ReblogShareTweetShareSUMMIT, NJ--(Marketwired - December 09, 2016) - ETF Managers Group, LLC today announced plans to close The Restaurant ETF (BITE) based on an ongoing review of its offerings and market demand. Effective immediately, BITE will increase its cash holdings in contemplation of liquidation and will no longer accept creation orders.Trading will be suspended on Nasdaq at the closing of the market on December 22, 2016. Proceeds of the liquidation will be sent to shareholders on or about December, 23, 2016. For added information, shareholders can visit www.biteetf.com.About ETF Managers GroupETF Managers Group, LLC is a leading Exchange Traded Funds (ETF) private label services company. ETF Managers Group offers a full range of ETF product services to the asset management community including commodity pool ETPs as well as both active and passive ETF funds. The services provided include product operations, regulatory, financial and compliance management. ETF Managers Group offers active marketing and dedicated wholesale services for all ETF product types and index construction.Carefully consider the Funds' investment objectives, risk factors, charges, and expenses before investing. This and additional information can be found in the Fund's prospectus, which may be obtained by calling 1-844-ETF-MGRS (1-844-383-6477), or by visiting www.biteetf.com. Read the prospectuses carefully before investing.The Fund is distributed by ALPS Distributors, Inc., which is not affiliated with ETF Managers Group, LLC or any of its affiliates.SDJ000344 Expires 12/05/2017ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextEnergy to Drive Q2 Earnings: Will ETFs Rebound?ZacksEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredTrump’s unwitting legacy could be universal health coverageYahoo FinanceSean Hannity responds to claim he ran up a $42,000 tab at Trump's hotel after flying in a 70-year-old lobster from MaineBusiness InsiderIntel impresses with strong quarter, Starbucks and Mattel shares are tankingYahoo FinanceDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredAmazon shares fall after profit falls way short of expectationsYahoo Finance Video9 ways to break free from your credit card debtYahoo FinanceTobacco stocks tank after FDA says it plans to cut nicotine in cigarettes to non-addictive levelsBusiness InsiderZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredU.S. economic growth picks up in second quarter, wages continue to lagReutersWall Street opens lower as Amazon weighs on tech stocksReutersExxon stock falls after earnings miss estimates; Chevron gainsYahoo Finance VideoThe Travel Card That Is Breaking thWise BreadSponsoredInvestors yawn as US economic growth rebounds in the second quarter; Amazon fallsYahoo FinanceAmazon billionaire Jeff Bezos' look has changed drastically since he started the companyBusiness InsiderKellyanne Conway: Ethical disclosures discourage people from government serviceJoe F: Conway has some legitimate competition now with Scaramucci on board about who can say the dumbest thing while representing the administration.  Looks like she just took the lead though.Join the Conversation1 / 52.6k











Targa Resources, Inc. (TRGP) Position Boosted by Advisors Capital Management LLC

























Edition: 



Our Contact 



July 28 2017








Breaking News


 


Google briefly identifies Tom Brady as owner of Jets





 


Jose Mourinho: 'We signed Romelu Lukaku due to Zlatan Ibrahimovic injury'










Trending Topics
Clay Helton Talks OJ Simpson, Says He's Not Welcome at USC
Barcelona president not ruling out Neymar exit amid PSG transfer rumours
Sanchez to return to Arsenal training amid continued transfer speculation












Targa Resources, Inc. (TRGP) Position Boosted by Advisors Capital Management LLC
Diego Costa trains solo in Brazil
Spaniard set for move to Newcastle - fee reportedly agreed
West Ham goalkeeper Adrian seeks move across London
Shikhar Dhawan thanks destiny after brutal 190 against Sri Lanka















 









Markets
Entertaiment
Industry
Science
Sport
Global News
Health Care
USA










 

Latest



'American Idol': Lionel Richie, Charlie Puth in talks to join judges panel
Reportedly, Charlie Puth is the current favorite for the spot, but producers are also considering Luke Bryan . Lionel Richie is the front-runner for one of the remaining two judging spots, according to TMZ .
Page Arthur B Has $241000 Stake in Reynolds American Inc (RAI)
The target price would indicate a potential upside of Infinity from the last close price of Reynolds American (NYSE:RAI).  Naples Global Advisors LLC raised its stake in shares of British American Tobacco p.l.c.by 2.4% in the second quarter.
Royal Bank Scotland PLC
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: This news story was originally published by The Cerbat Gem and is owned by of The Cerbat Gem. The financial services provider posted $0.18 EPS (EPS) for the period, exceeding wall street forecast of $0.13 by $0.05.
Shikhar Dhawan thanks destiny after brutal 190 against Sri Lanka
As replays showed no portion of the bat was grounded inside when Saha dislodged the stumps and Tharanga had to walk back. Dhawan scored a steady 64 off 78 balls by the first break of the day, hitting eight boundaries along the way.
Huawei Mate 10 surpasses iPhone 8 in many aspects, says Huawei chief
Huawei plans to unveil this autumn an "AI processor" as it seeks to move from making smartphones to "intelligent phones", Yu said. He did however tease the "launch of our own AI processor" meant to take the "intelligence" of today's phones to the next level.
Paulo Dybala: 'My future is up to Juventus'
The 23-year-old has become one of Europe's hottest properties after joining the Old Lady of Turin from Palermo two years ago. However, Dybala says he is not considering a move at present and is enjoying pre-season with the Serie A champions.
LawBreakers hosting one more beta this weekend
That said, you can unlock loot crates by simply playing the game, and are not forced to pay for cosmetic items at all.  Players should be able to pre-download the beta in "the next 24 hours", according to the developer .
IN  police officer killed after being shot multiple times
Kendale Adams of the Indianapolis Metropolitan Police Department at a press conference, according to the Associated Press . Waters was traveling eastbound on the interstate when a semi hit his vehicle from behind, fire officials told FOX 59 .
Authorities Rescue 13 Teens In Wide-Reaching Sex Trafficking Ring
Investigators said the case is ongoing, including finding those who solicited the teens and young women. "Be vigilant. In this case more than a dozen victims were identified and Boudreaux believes there will be more.
Labour Brexit views due to complexity, Mark Drakeford says
The Shadow Chancellor, John McDonnell , has said United Kingdom and Welsh Labour are on "the same page " when it comes to Brexit. Labour's general election manifesto called for the benefits of the single market and customs union to be retained after Brexit.
Indian Women's Cricket Team Receives Immense Reception from Crowd at Mumbai
India has found a new anthem i.e women's cricket. "Playing in the Big Bash was a great experience for me and Smriti". One such name was Ekta Bisht, who spun a web around the best players of the world in the World Cup.
NIA summons SAS Geelani's elder son for questioning
The accused have been charged under various sections of the Indian Penal Code (IPC) and the Unlawful Activities (Prevention) Act.
Trump tweets more criticism about Sessions
It would have been easy for the two to meet, but it's clear the president doesn't want to meet with sessions, at least not yet. Attorney community, but in times like this, the men and women of the department of justice continue to do our work.
Trump to speak Friday on illegal immigration, violent crime crackdown
Every gang member who is deported from the US returns to his home country - in this case, many would be sent back to El Salvador. Authorities estimate the group has tens of thousands of members across several Central American countries and many US states.
Samsung Pay might be coming to non-Samsung Android smartphones
This could be similar to the LoopPay Card Case , which is a small battery-powered "puck" that enables mobile payments .  The report says that Samsung is in discussions with OEMs for launching Samsung Pay on other, "high-end smartphones".


 

Recommended



Samsung Dethrones Intel As World's Biggest Chip Maker

WhatsApp Reaches 1 Billion Daily Active Users

Greenleaf Trust Invests $694000 in Park Hotels & Resorts Inc. (PK)

Carl Domino Inc Sells 3000 Shares of Twitter, Inc. (TWTR)

Wanted actor Inder Kumar passes away at 42

Sports Direct boss Ashley wins £15m battle with banker

Haim Covers Shania Twain's Classic 'That Don't Impress Me Much'

At least 48 injured in Barcelona commuter train crash

India top court orders changes in anti-dowry law to stop misuse

ICICI Bank shares dip three per cent after Q1 results






 

Published: Fri, July 28, 2017  
Sport | By Wendy Sparks 



  Targa Resources, Inc. (TRGP) Position Boosted by Advisors Capital Management LLC





They now have a United States dollars 60 price target on the stock. Geosphere Capital invested in 57,250 shares or 3.69% of the stock. Targa Resources has a 12 month low of $35.35 and a 12 month high of $61.83. OppenheimerFunds Inc. now owns 8,956,121 shares of the pipeline company's stock worth $536,472,000 after buying an additional 611,465 shares in the last quarter. 1,800,561 shares of the stock were exchanged. About shares traded. Targa Resources Corp (NYSE:TRGP) has risen 18.42% since July 27, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 1.72% the S&P500. Maryland-based Adams Diversified Equity Fund Incorporated has invested 1.41% in Aetna Inc (NYSE:AET). Tph Asset Management Llc acquired 267,666 shares as Targa Res Corp (TRGP)'s stock declined 13.24%. Johnson Financial Group LLC now owns 4,418 shares of the pipeline company's stock valued at $265,000 after buying an additional 238 shares in the last quarter. The company has market cap of $211.97 million. 857,492 stocks of the shares transacted hands. About 47,895 shares traded.It is down 0.00% since July 27, 2016 and is. It has underperformed by 90.72% the S&P500.Among 18 analysts covering Targa Resources (NYSE:TRGP), 13 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 5 Hold. Therefore 80% are positive. Citigroup upgraded the shares of EQC in report on Monday, September 14 to "Neutral" rating. As per Thursday, July 13, the company rating was maintained by Deutsche Bank. (NASDAQ:AKAM) on Wednesday, February 10 with "Neutral" rating. The stock now has a consensus recommendation of Buy and a consensus price objective of $54.16.05/02/2017 - Targa Resources, Inc. was upgraded to "buy" by analysts at Seaport Global Securities. Breton Hill Capital Ltd.'s holdings in Targa Resources were worth $997,000 as of its most recent SEC filing.
Today Analysts Focus on The Boeing Company (BA), Juniper Networks, Inc. (JNPR)
					Instinet reissued a "buy" rating and set a $33.00 target price on shares of Juniper Networks in a report on Thursday, April 6th. The total number of shares percentage held by insiders is about 7.81% while the number of Shares % held by institutions is 81%.
					The company is so far trading up by 2.49% since yesterday's close of $46.25. On Tuesday, October 13 the stock rating was maintained by Barclays Capital with "Overweight". The firm has "Outperform" rating by RBC Capital Markets given on Tuesday, September 8.Investors sentiment increased to 1.2 in Q4 2016.Since February 1, 2017, it had 0 buys, and 6 selling transactions for $2.34 million activity. Shares for $574,706 were sold by MELOY MATTHEW J. 73 funds opened positions while 133 raised stakes. Montag A And Assoc reported 0.07% of its portfolio in Aetna Inc (NYSE:AET). Cubic Asset Mngmt Ltd Liability Corporation reported 14,362 shares or 0.55% of all its holdings. Invesco has 0% invested in Century Bancorp, Inc. Dnb Asset Mgmt As owns 12,000 shares for 0% of their portfolio. Tygh Mgmt stated it has 0.78% of its portfolio in Continental Building Products Inc (NYSE:CBPX). The Center Coast Capital Advisors Lp holds 4.13 million shares with $231.61 million value, down from 5.07M last quarter. 173,973 were accumulated by Wellington Mngmt Llp. Vanguard Gp has 0% invested in Janus Henderson Group PLC (LON:HGG) for 459,857 shares. Hodges Management Inc has 5,850 shares for 0.02% of their portfolio. Northern Corp accumulated 435,198 shares.Chickasaw Capital Management Llc increased Mplx Lp (NYSE:MPLX) stake by 311,317 shares to 2.99M valued at $103.39 million in 2016Q4. Jefferies Grp Inc Ltd Com has 270 shares. Seekingalpha.com's news article titled: "Continental Building Products (CBPX) Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript" with publication date: May 04, 2017 was also an interesting one. Finally, Royal Bank Of Canada reissued a "buy" rating and set a $67.00 target price on shares of Targa Resources in a research note on Monday, May 8th. Therefore 72% are positive. Guggenheim started coverage on Targa Resources in a research report on Monday, April 17th.
UPSC Civil Services Prelims Result 2017 declared at upsc
					The schedule and e-admit cards for the main exam will be put 2 weeks before the main exam , according to the note on the website. Those candidates, who have been selected need to fill up DAF online and submit the same from September 7 till September 20.
					Targa Resources is a midstream energy company in North America. Any way you dice it, a dip below $45.39 a share would be very bad news for TRGP's technical picture in the near-term. Geosphere Capital has invested 3.69% in Targa Resources Corp (NYSE:TRGP). Peel Hunt maintained the stock with "Hold" rating in Monday, December 5 report. The firm earned "Sell" rating on Friday, November 20 by Goldman Sachs. The firm has "Underperform" rating by Jefferies given on Tuesday, April 26. It also upped Phillips 66 Partners Lp (NYSE:PSXP) stake by 22,252 shares and now owns 3.11 million shares. (NYSE:TRGP) was up +0.73% during the last day of trading, with a day high of 47.42. BlackRock Inc. now owns 10,090,553 shares of the pipeline company's stock worth $604,426,000 after buying an additional 9,757,325 shares during the period.TRGP has been the subject of a number of research analyst reports.Investors sentiment is 1.46 in 2016 Q4. Its the same as in 2016Q3.A number of other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also recently made changes to their positions in the stock. 146.32 million shares or 1.69% more from 143.89 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported.
Diego Costa trains solo in Brazil
					If they go out in the first round of the Champions League, it's not a tragedy. "If I had to buy one striker I would go to Kane". Conte said they have lower expectations than their Premier League title rivals.
					07/13/2017 - Targa Resources, Inc. was downgraded to " by analysts at Deutsche Bank. CRISP CHARLES R sold $434,046 worth of stock or 7,500 shares. Citadel Advisors Limited Liability stated it has 0.03% in Targa Resources Corp (NYSE:TRGP). Susquehanna International Llp has invested 0% in Targa Resources Corp (NYSE:TRGP). Van ECK Associates Corp boosted its position in shares of Targa Resources by 29.1% in the first quarter. RBC Capital Markets maintained it with "Outperform" rating and $52 target in Thursday, November 3 report. Mcf Limited Liability Corporation invested in 0.01% or 470 shares. 800,129 were reported by Edge Asset. The fund owned 192,101 shares of the pipeline company's stock after buying an additional 17,720 shares during the period. Targa Res Corp Com now has $9.96B valuation. Ent Financial Corp owns 364 shares or 0.01% of their USA portfolio.

 

Like this:

House Speaker Ryan defends Priebus

Sauber Cancel 2018 Honda Engine Deal

Spaniard set for move to Newcastle - fee reportedly agreed

Did Samsung just say it's afraid of the iPhone 8?

Potash Corporation of Saskatchewan Inc. (NYSE:POT) Releases FY17 Earnings Guidance

Standoff at Jerusalem holy site after metal detectors removed

Samsung May Bring Its Payment Service to Rivals' Smartphones

Macaulay Culkin looks healthier than ever as he shows off image overhaul

Latest funding round values SpaceX at $21.2 billion, up 76% since 2015

FG suspends crude oil exploration in Lake Chad Basin after deadly attacks

New York Post Mocks Trump's "White House Survivor" Cabinet in Latest Cover

BJP Office Allegedly Attacked by CPI(M) Activists in Thiruvananthapuram, Workers Vandalise Houses

Putin seizes United States  buildings in shock RETALIATION to crackdown on Russian Federation 

West Ham goalkeeper Adrian seeks move across London

'Wonder Woman 2' gets December 2019 release date








Related News


Share














Google briefly identifies Tom Brady as owner of Jets





Jose Mourinho: 'We signed Romelu Lukaku due to Zlatan Ibrahimovic injury'





Clay Helton Talks OJ Simpson, Says He's Not Welcome at USC





Barcelona president not ruling out Neymar exit amid PSG transfer rumours




 
 



 

 
 

     
   
 



    Copyright ©  JoshnAijaBlog, All Rights Reserved  , feedback@joshnaijablog.com         

  

 


Targa Resources, Inc. (TRGP) Position Boosted by Advisors Capital Management LLC

























Edition: 



Our Contact 



July 28 2017








Breaking News


 


Google briefly identifies Tom Brady as owner of Jets





 


Jose Mourinho: 'We signed Romelu Lukaku due to Zlatan Ibrahimovic injury'










Trending Topics
Clay Helton Talks OJ Simpson, Says He's Not Welcome at USC
Barcelona president not ruling out Neymar exit amid PSG transfer rumours
Sanchez to return to Arsenal training amid continued transfer speculation












Targa Resources, Inc. (TRGP) Position Boosted by Advisors Capital Management LLC
Diego Costa trains solo in Brazil
Spaniard set for move to Newcastle - fee reportedly agreed
West Ham goalkeeper Adrian seeks move across London
Shikhar Dhawan thanks destiny after brutal 190 against Sri Lanka















 









Markets
Entertaiment
Industry
Science
Sport
Global News
Health Care
USA










 

Latest



'American Idol': Lionel Richie, Charlie Puth in talks to join judges panel
Reportedly, Charlie Puth is the current favorite for the spot, but producers are also considering Luke Bryan . Lionel Richie is the front-runner for one of the remaining two judging spots, according to TMZ .
Page Arthur B Has $241000 Stake in Reynolds American Inc (RAI)
The target price would indicate a potential upside of Infinity from the last close price of Reynolds American (NYSE:RAI).  Naples Global Advisors LLC raised its stake in shares of British American Tobacco p.l.c.by 2.4% in the second quarter.
Royal Bank Scotland PLC
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: This news story was originally published by The Cerbat Gem and is owned by of The Cerbat Gem. The financial services provider posted $0.18 EPS (EPS) for the period, exceeding wall street forecast of $0.13 by $0.05.
Shikhar Dhawan thanks destiny after brutal 190 against Sri Lanka
As replays showed no portion of the bat was grounded inside when Saha dislodged the stumps and Tharanga had to walk back. Dhawan scored a steady 64 off 78 balls by the first break of the day, hitting eight boundaries along the way.
Huawei Mate 10 surpasses iPhone 8 in many aspects, says Huawei chief
Huawei plans to unveil this autumn an "AI processor" as it seeks to move from making smartphones to "intelligent phones", Yu said. He did however tease the "launch of our own AI processor" meant to take the "intelligence" of today's phones to the next level.
Paulo Dybala: 'My future is up to Juventus'
The 23-year-old has become one of Europe's hottest properties after joining the Old Lady of Turin from Palermo two years ago. However, Dybala says he is not considering a move at present and is enjoying pre-season with the Serie A champions.
LawBreakers hosting one more beta this weekend
That said, you can unlock loot crates by simply playing the game, and are not forced to pay for cosmetic items at all.  Players should be able to pre-download the beta in "the next 24 hours", according to the developer .
IN  police officer killed after being shot multiple times
Kendale Adams of the Indianapolis Metropolitan Police Department at a press conference, according to the Associated Press . Waters was traveling eastbound on the interstate when a semi hit his vehicle from behind, fire officials told FOX 59 .
Authorities Rescue 13 Teens In Wide-Reaching Sex Trafficking Ring
Investigators said the case is ongoing, including finding those who solicited the teens and young women. "Be vigilant. In this case more than a dozen victims were identified and Boudreaux believes there will be more.
Labour Brexit views due to complexity, Mark Drakeford says
The Shadow Chancellor, John McDonnell , has said United Kingdom and Welsh Labour are on "the same page " when it comes to Brexit. Labour's general election manifesto called for the benefits of the single market and customs union to be retained after Brexit.
Indian Women's Cricket Team Receives Immense Reception from Crowd at Mumbai
India has found a new anthem i.e women's cricket. "Playing in the Big Bash was a great experience for me and Smriti". One such name was Ekta Bisht, who spun a web around the best players of the world in the World Cup.
NIA summons SAS Geelani's elder son for questioning
The accused have been charged under various sections of the Indian Penal Code (IPC) and the Unlawful Activities (Prevention) Act.
Trump tweets more criticism about Sessions
It would have been easy for the two to meet, but it's clear the president doesn't want to meet with sessions, at least not yet. Attorney community, but in times like this, the men and women of the department of justice continue to do our work.
Trump to speak Friday on illegal immigration, violent crime crackdown
Every gang member who is deported from the US returns to his home country - in this case, many would be sent back to El Salvador. Authorities estimate the group has tens of thousands of members across several Central American countries and many US states.
Samsung Pay might be coming to non-Samsung Android smartphones
This could be similar to the LoopPay Card Case , which is a small battery-powered "puck" that enables mobile payments .  The report says that Samsung is in discussions with OEMs for launching Samsung Pay on other, "high-end smartphones".


 

Recommended



Samsung Dethrones Intel As World's Biggest Chip Maker

WhatsApp Reaches 1 Billion Daily Active Users

Greenleaf Trust Invests $694000 in Park Hotels & Resorts Inc. (PK)

Carl Domino Inc Sells 3000 Shares of Twitter, Inc. (TWTR)

Wanted actor Inder Kumar passes away at 42

Sports Direct boss Ashley wins £15m battle with banker

Haim Covers Shania Twain's Classic 'That Don't Impress Me Much'

At least 48 injured in Barcelona commuter train crash

India top court orders changes in anti-dowry law to stop misuse

ICICI Bank shares dip three per cent after Q1 results






 

Published: Fri, July 28, 2017  
Sport | By Wendy Sparks 



  Targa Resources, Inc. (TRGP) Position Boosted by Advisors Capital Management LLC





They now have a United States dollars 60 price target on the stock. Geosphere Capital invested in 57,250 shares or 3.69% of the stock. Targa Resources has a 12 month low of $35.35 and a 12 month high of $61.83. OppenheimerFunds Inc. now owns 8,956,121 shares of the pipeline company's stock worth $536,472,000 after buying an additional 611,465 shares in the last quarter. 1,800,561 shares of the stock were exchanged. About shares traded. Targa Resources Corp (NYSE:TRGP) has risen 18.42% since July 27, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 1.72% the S&P500. Maryland-based Adams Diversified Equity Fund Incorporated has invested 1.41% in Aetna Inc (NYSE:AET). Tph Asset Management Llc acquired 267,666 shares as Targa Res Corp (TRGP)'s stock declined 13.24%. Johnson Financial Group LLC now owns 4,418 shares of the pipeline company's stock valued at $265,000 after buying an additional 238 shares in the last quarter. The company has market cap of $211.97 million. 857,492 stocks of the shares transacted hands. About 47,895 shares traded.It is down 0.00% since July 27, 2016 and is. It has underperformed by 90.72% the S&P500.Among 18 analysts covering Targa Resources (NYSE:TRGP), 13 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 5 Hold. Therefore 80% are positive. Citigroup upgraded the shares of EQC in report on Monday, September 14 to "Neutral" rating. As per Thursday, July 13, the company rating was maintained by Deutsche Bank. (NASDAQ:AKAM) on Wednesday, February 10 with "Neutral" rating. The stock now has a consensus recommendation of Buy and a consensus price objective of $54.16.05/02/2017 - Targa Resources, Inc. was upgraded to "buy" by analysts at Seaport Global Securities. Breton Hill Capital Ltd.'s holdings in Targa Resources were worth $997,000 as of its most recent SEC filing.
Today Analysts Focus on The Boeing Company (BA), Juniper Networks, Inc. (JNPR)
					Instinet reissued a "buy" rating and set a $33.00 target price on shares of Juniper Networks in a report on Thursday, April 6th. The total number of shares percentage held by insiders is about 7.81% while the number of Shares % held by institutions is 81%.
					The company is so far trading up by 2.49% since yesterday's close of $46.25. On Tuesday, October 13 the stock rating was maintained by Barclays Capital with "Overweight". The firm has "Outperform" rating by RBC Capital Markets given on Tuesday, September 8.Investors sentiment increased to 1.2 in Q4 2016.Since February 1, 2017, it had 0 buys, and 6 selling transactions for $2.34 million activity. Shares for $574,706 were sold by MELOY MATTHEW J. 73 funds opened positions while 133 raised stakes. Montag A And Assoc reported 0.07% of its portfolio in Aetna Inc (NYSE:AET). Cubic Asset Mngmt Ltd Liability Corporation reported 14,362 shares or 0.55% of all its holdings. Invesco has 0% invested in Century Bancorp, Inc. Dnb Asset Mgmt As owns 12,000 shares for 0% of their portfolio. Tygh Mgmt stated it has 0.78% of its portfolio in Continental Building Products Inc (NYSE:CBPX). The Center Coast Capital Advisors Lp holds 4.13 million shares with $231.61 million value, down from 5.07M last quarter. 173,973 were accumulated by Wellington Mngmt Llp. Vanguard Gp has 0% invested in Janus Henderson Group PLC (LON:HGG) for 459,857 shares. Hodges Management Inc has 5,850 shares for 0.02% of their portfolio. Northern Corp accumulated 435,198 shares.Chickasaw Capital Management Llc increased Mplx Lp (NYSE:MPLX) stake by 311,317 shares to 2.99M valued at $103.39 million in 2016Q4. Jefferies Grp Inc Ltd Com has 270 shares. Seekingalpha.com's news article titled: "Continental Building Products (CBPX) Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript" with publication date: May 04, 2017 was also an interesting one. Finally, Royal Bank Of Canada reissued a "buy" rating and set a $67.00 target price on shares of Targa Resources in a research note on Monday, May 8th. Therefore 72% are positive. Guggenheim started coverage on Targa Resources in a research report on Monday, April 17th.
UPSC Civil Services Prelims Result 2017 declared at upsc
					The schedule and e-admit cards for the main exam will be put 2 weeks before the main exam , according to the note on the website. Those candidates, who have been selected need to fill up DAF online and submit the same from September 7 till September 20.
					Targa Resources is a midstream energy company in North America. Any way you dice it, a dip below $45.39 a share would be very bad news for TRGP's technical picture in the near-term. Geosphere Capital has invested 3.69% in Targa Resources Corp (NYSE:TRGP). Peel Hunt maintained the stock with "Hold" rating in Monday, December 5 report. The firm earned "Sell" rating on Friday, November 20 by Goldman Sachs. The firm has "Underperform" rating by Jefferies given on Tuesday, April 26. It also upped Phillips 66 Partners Lp (NYSE:PSXP) stake by 22,252 shares and now owns 3.11 million shares. (NYSE:TRGP) was up +0.73% during the last day of trading, with a day high of 47.42. BlackRock Inc. now owns 10,090,553 shares of the pipeline company's stock worth $604,426,000 after buying an additional 9,757,325 shares during the period.TRGP has been the subject of a number of research analyst reports.Investors sentiment is 1.46 in 2016 Q4. Its the same as in 2016Q3.A number of other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also recently made changes to their positions in the stock. 146.32 million shares or 1.69% more from 143.89 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported.
Diego Costa trains solo in Brazil
					If they go out in the first round of the Champions League, it's not a tragedy. "If I had to buy one striker I would go to Kane". Conte said they have lower expectations than their Premier League title rivals.
					07/13/2017 - Targa Resources, Inc. was downgraded to " by analysts at Deutsche Bank. CRISP CHARLES R sold $434,046 worth of stock or 7,500 shares. Citadel Advisors Limited Liability stated it has 0.03% in Targa Resources Corp (NYSE:TRGP). Susquehanna International Llp has invested 0% in Targa Resources Corp (NYSE:TRGP). Van ECK Associates Corp boosted its position in shares of Targa Resources by 29.1% in the first quarter. RBC Capital Markets maintained it with "Outperform" rating and $52 target in Thursday, November 3 report. Mcf Limited Liability Corporation invested in 0.01% or 470 shares. 800,129 were reported by Edge Asset. The fund owned 192,101 shares of the pipeline company's stock after buying an additional 17,720 shares during the period. Targa Res Corp Com now has $9.96B valuation. Ent Financial Corp owns 364 shares or 0.01% of their USA portfolio.

 

Like this:

House Speaker Ryan defends Priebus

Sauber Cancel 2018 Honda Engine Deal

Spaniard set for move to Newcastle - fee reportedly agreed

Did Samsung just say it's afraid of the iPhone 8?

Potash Corporation of Saskatchewan Inc. (NYSE:POT) Releases FY17 Earnings Guidance

Standoff at Jerusalem holy site after metal detectors removed

Samsung May Bring Its Payment Service to Rivals' Smartphones

Macaulay Culkin looks healthier than ever as he shows off image overhaul

Latest funding round values SpaceX at $21.2 billion, up 76% since 2015

FG suspends crude oil exploration in Lake Chad Basin after deadly attacks

New York Post Mocks Trump's "White House Survivor" Cabinet in Latest Cover

BJP Office Allegedly Attacked by CPI(M) Activists in Thiruvananthapuram, Workers Vandalise Houses

Putin seizes United States  buildings in shock RETALIATION to crackdown on Russian Federation 

West Ham goalkeeper Adrian seeks move across London

'Wonder Woman 2' gets December 2019 release date








Related News


Share














Google briefly identifies Tom Brady as owner of Jets





Jose Mourinho: 'We signed Romelu Lukaku due to Zlatan Ibrahimovic injury'





Clay Helton Talks OJ Simpson, Says He's Not Welcome at USC





Barcelona president not ruling out Neymar exit amid PSG transfer rumours




 
 



 

 
 

     
   
 



    Copyright ©  JoshnAijaBlog, All Rights Reserved  , feedback@joshnaijablog.com         

  

 